California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(4) The amount of the credit under this section shall not exceed two hundred dollars ($200) for any taxable year. 

(b) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1988, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the maximum credit prescribed in subdivision (a). That computation shall be made as follows:

(1) The California Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California
 Consumer Price Index as modified for rental equivalent homeownership for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year. 

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure which is furnished to them pursuant to paragraph (1) and divide the result by 100. 

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the immediately preceding taxable year credit by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one dollar ($1). 

(c) “Qualified joint custody head of household” means an individual who meets all of the following:

(1) Is not married at the close of the taxable year, or files a
 separate return and does not have his or her spouse as a member of his or her household during the entire taxable year. 

(2) Maintains as his or her home a household which constitutes for the taxable year the principal place of abode for a qualifying child, as defined in subdivision (d), for no less than 146 days of the taxable year but no more than 219 days of the taxable year, under a decree of dissolution or separate maintenance, or under a written agreement between the parents prior to the issuance of a decree of dissolution or separate maintenance where the proceedings have been initiated. 

(3) Furnishes over one-half the cost of maintaining the household during the taxable year. 

(4) Does not qualify as a head of household under Section 17042 or as a surviving spouse under Section 17046. 

(d) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying child” means a son, stepson, daughter, or stepdaughter of the taxpayer or a descendant of a son or daughter of the taxpayer, but if that son, stepson, daughter, stepdaughter, or descendant is married at the close of the taxpayer’s taxable year, only if the taxpayer is entitled to a credit for the taxable year for that person under Section 17054. 

(e) “Qualified taxpayer” means an individual who meets all of the following:

(1) Is married and files a separate return.

(2) During the last six months of the taxable year the taxpayer’s spouse was not a member of the taxpayer’s household.

(3) Maintains a household, whether or not the taxpayer’s home,
 which constitutes the principal place of abode of a dependent mother or father of the taxpayer for the taxable year. 

(4) Furnishes over one-half of the cost of maintaining the household during the taxable year.

(5) Does not qualify as a head of household under Section 17042 or as a surviving spouse under Section 17046.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 987, Sec. 6.5.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

17054.7.

(a) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax” (as defined in Section 17039) for a “qualified senior head of household” (as defined in subdivision (c)) an amount equal to 2 percent of the taxable income. 

(b) For each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1991, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the adjusted gross income specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c). Those computations shall be made as follows:

(1) The California Department of Industrial Relations shall transmit annually to the Franchise Tax Board the percentage change in the California Consumer Price Index as modified for rental equivalent home ownership for all items from June of the prior calendar year to June of the current calendar year, no later than August 1 of the current calendar year. 

(2) The Franchise Tax Board shall add 100 percent to the percentage change figure which is furnished pursuant to paragraph (1) and divide the result by 100. 

(3) The Franchise Tax Board shall multiply the amount for the immediately preceding taxable year for the adjusted gross income limitation specified in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) by the inflation adjustment factor determined in paragraph (2), and round off the resulting product to the nearest one dollar
 ($1).

(c) “Qualified senior head of household” means an individual who meets all of the following:

(1) Attained the age of 65 before the close of the taxable year. 

(2) Qualified as the head of household in accordance with Section 17042 for either of the two taxable years immediately preceding the taxable year by providing a household for a qualifying individual who died during either of the two taxable years immediately preceding the taxable year. 

(3) Whose adjusted gross income for the taxable year does not exceed thirty-seven thousand five hundred dollars ($37,500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 12.   Effective October 6, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

17055.

(a) An individual who is a nonresident or a part-year resident shall be allowed all credits provided under this part against the “net tax,” as defined by Section 17039, except those described in subdivision (b) and in Section 17053.5, relating to the renter’s credit, and Section 18002, relating to taxes paid to another state, in the same proportion as the ratio that “taxable income of a nonresident or part-year resident” computed under paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17041 bears to “total taxable income,” as defined in Section 17301.5.

(b) Credits allowed under this part that are conditional upon a transaction occurring wholly within California and the credit allowed under Section 17052.10 or 17052.11 shall be allowed in their entirety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 17, Sec. 11.   (SB 132)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

17056.

For the purposes of this part, the term “dependents” has the same meaning as that term is defined by Section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 488, Sec. 15.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

17057.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the amount of the state low-income housing tax credit allocated to a project pursuant to Section 17058 shall not exceed an amount in addition to the federal tax credit that is necessary for the financial feasibility of the project and its viability throughout the extended use period.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 166) by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1349, Sec. 6.1.   Effective September 26, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

17058.

(a) (1) There shall be allowed as a credit against the “net tax,” defined in Section 17039, a state low-income housing tax credit in an amount equal to the amount determined in subdivision (c), computed in accordance with Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, except as otherwise provided in this section.

(2) “Taxpayer,” for purposes of this section, means the sole owner in the case of an individual, the partners in the case of a partnership, and the shareholders in the case of an “S” corporation.

(3) “Housing sponsor,” for purposes of this section, means the sole owner in the case of an individual, the partnership in the case of a
 partnership, and the “S” corporation in the case of an “S” corporation.

(b) (1) The amount of the credit allocated to any housing sponsor shall be authorized by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, or any successor thereof, based on a project’s need for the credit for economic feasibility in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(A) The low-income housing project shall be located in California and shall meet either of the following requirements:

(i) Except for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, that are allocated credits solely under the set-aside described in subdivision (c) of Section 50199.20 of the Health and Safety Code, the project’s housing sponsor has been allocated by the
 California Tax Credit Allocation Committee a credit for federal income tax purposes under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit.

(ii) It qualifies for a credit under Section 42(h)(4)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rule where 50 percent or more of building is financed with tax-exempt bonds subject to volume cap.

(B) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall not require fees for the credit under this section in addition to those fees required for applications for the tax credit pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit. The committee may require a fee if the application for the credit under this section is submitted in a calendar year after the year the application is submitted for the federal tax credit.

(C) (i) For a project that receives a preliminary reservation of the state low-income housing tax credit, allowed pursuant to subdivision (a), on or after January 1, 2009, the credit shall be allocated to the partners of a partnership owning the project in accordance with the partnership agreement, regardless of how the federal low-income housing tax credit with respect to the project is allocated to the partners, or whether the allocation of the credit under the terms of the agreement has substantial economic effect, within the meaning of Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination of distributive share.

(ii) To the extent the allocation of the credit to a partner under this section lacks substantial economic effect, any loss or deduction otherwise allowable under this part that is attributable to the sale or other disposition of that
 partner’s partnership interest made prior to the expiration of the federal credit shall not be allowed in the taxable year in which the sale or other disposition occurs, but shall instead be deferred until and treated as if it occurred in the first taxable year immediately following the taxable year in which the federal credit period expires for the project described in clause (i).

(iii) This subparagraph shall not apply to a project that receives a preliminary reservation of state low-income housing tax credits under the set-aside described in subdivision (c) of Section 50199.20 of the Health and Safety Code unless the project also receives a preliminary reservation of federal low-income housing tax credits.

(2) (A) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall certify to the housing sponsor the amount of tax credit under this section allocated to the
 housing sponsor for each credit period.

(B) In the case of a partnership or an “S” corporation, the housing sponsor shall provide a copy of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee certification to the taxpayer.

(C) (i) A taxpayer shall be eligible to claim the credit commencing in the taxable year the building is placed in service and the federal credit period commences, notwithstanding that the certification pursuant to subparagraph (A) has not been issued by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, provided that the housing sponsor has filed a taxpayer certification with the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and delivered a copy to the taxpayer. The amount of credit claimed by the taxpayer shall not exceed the pro rata share with respect to the amount of credit that the taxpayer purchased or is allocated per the partnership agreement,
 as applicable, of the lesser of either of the following:

(I) The applicable percentages for each of the four credit years, as specified in subdivision (c), multiplied by the qualified basis of the building set forth in the preliminary reservation.

(II) The amount of credit the project is eligible for as stated in the taxpayer certification.

(ii) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may, but is not required to, review the taxpayer certification and other information provided by the housing sponsor to confirm both of the following:

(I) The calculations set forth in the taxpayer certification.

(II) The amount of credits allocated to the project is consistent with applicable
 California Tax Credit Allocation Committee rules and regulations for the purposes of making the certification required pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(iii) If the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee issues a certification pursuant to subparagraph (A) that is inconsistent with the taxpayer certification upon which a credit has been claimed, the taxpayer shall amend any previously filed tax returns to reflect the credit amount certified by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(iv) For purposes of this subparagraph, “taxpayer certification” means a certified statement from the certified public accountant of the housing sponsor. The taxpayer certification shall contain the amount of the credit the project is eligible for, the taxable year the building is placed in service, and the taxable year in which the federal credit period for the
 building has commenced.

(v) The taxpayer shall, upon request, provide a copy of the taxpayer certification pursuant to clause (iv) or the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee’s certification pursuant to subparagraph (A), as applicable, to the Franchise Tax Board.

(vi) In the case of a failure to provide a copy of the taxpayer certification pursuant to clause (iv) or the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee’s certification pursuant to subparagraph (A), if the Franchise Tax Board so requires, no credit under this section shall be allowed for that taxable year until a copy of that certification is provided.

(vii) The changes made to this subparagraph by the act adding this clause shall apply for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2023.

(D) All elections made by the taxpayer pursuant to Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, apply to this section.

(E) (i) Except as described in clause (ii) or (iii), for buildings located in designated difficult development areas (DDAs) or qualified census tracts (QCTs), as defined in Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas, credits may be allocated under this section in the amounts prescribed in subdivision (c), provided that the amount of credit allocated under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, is computed on 100 percent of the qualified basis of the building.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate the credit for buildings located in
 DDAs or QCTs that are restricted to having 50 percent of the building’s occupants be special needs households, as defined in the California Code of Regulations by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, or receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), even if the taxpayer receives federal credits pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas, provided that the credit allowed under this section shall not exceed 30 percent of the eligible basis of the building.

(iii) On and after January 1, 2018, notwithstanding clause (i), the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate the credit pursuant to paragraph (7) of subdivision (c) even if the taxpayer receives federal credits, pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas.

(F) (i) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate a credit under this section in exchange for a credit allocated pursuant to Section 42(d)(5)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to increase in credit for buildings in high-cost areas, in amounts up to 30 percent of the eligible basis of a building if the credits allowed under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, are reduced by an equivalent amount.

(ii) An equivalent amount shall be determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee based upon the relative amount required to produce an equivalent state tax credit to the taxpayer.

(c) Section 42(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to applicable percentage: 70 percent present value credit for certain new buildings; 30
 percent present value credit for certain other buildings, shall be modified as follows:

(1) In the case of any qualified low-income building placed in service by the housing sponsor during 1987, the term “applicable percentage” means 9 percent for each of the first three years and 3 percent for the fourth year for new buildings (whether or not the building is federally subsidized) and for existing buildings.

(2) In the case of any qualified low-income building that receives an allocation after 1989 and is a new building not federally subsidized, the term “applicable percentage” means the following:

(A) For each of the first three years, the percentage prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury for new buildings that are not federally subsidized for the taxable year, determined in accordance with the requirements of
 Section 42(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to temporary minimum credit rate for nonfederally subsidized new buildings, in lieu of the percentage prescribed in Section 42(b)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(B) For the fourth year, the difference between 30 percent and the sum of the applicable percentages for the first three years.

(3) In the case of any qualified low-income building that is a new building that is federally subsidized and receiving an allocation pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), the term “applicable percentage” means for the first three years, 9 percent of the qualified basis of the building, and for the fourth year, 3 percent of the qualified basis of the building.

(4) In the case of any qualified low-income building that receives an allocation after
 1989 pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) and that is a new building that is federally subsidized or that is an existing building that is “at risk of conversion,” the term “applicable percentage” means the following:

(A) For each of the first three years, the percentage prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury for new buildings that are federally subsidized for the taxable year.

(B) For the fourth year, the difference between 13 percent and the sum of the applicable percentages for the first three years.

(5) In the case of any qualified low-income building that meets all of the requirements of subparagraphs (A) through (D), inclusive, the term “applicable percentage” means 30 percent for each of the first three years and 5 percent for the fourth year. A qualified low-income building
 receiving an allocation under this paragraph is ineligible to also receive an allocation under paragraph (3).

(A) The qualified low-income building is at least 15 years old.

(B) The qualified low-income building is either:

(i) Serving households of very low income or extremely low income such that the average maximum household income as restricted, pursuant to an existing regulatory agreement with a federal, state, county, local, or other governmental agency, is not more than 45 percent of the area median gross income, as determined under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, adjusted by household size, and a tax credit regulatory agreement is entered into for a period of not less than 55 years restricting the average targeted household income to no more than 45 percent of
 the area median income.

(ii) Financed under Section 514 or 521 of the National Housing Act of 1949 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1485).

(C) The qualified low-income building would have insufficient credits under paragraphs (2) and (3) to complete substantial rehabilitation due to a low appraised value.

(D) The qualified low-income building will complete the substantial rehabilitation in connection with the credit allocation herein.

(6) For purposes of this section, the term “at risk of conversion,” with respect to an existing property, means a property that satisfies all of the following criteria:

(A) The property is a multifamily rental housing development in which at least 50 percent of the units
 receive governmental assistance pursuant to any of the following:

(i) New construction, substantial rehabilitation, moderate rehabilitation, property disposition, and loan management set-aside programs, or any other program providing project-based assistance pursuant to Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937, Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United States Code, as amended.

(ii) The Below-Market-Interest-Rate Program pursuant to Section 221(d)(3) of the National Housing Act, Sections 1715l(d)(3) and (5) of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(iii) Section 236 of the National Housing Act, Section 1715z-1 of Title 12 of the United States Code.

(iv) Programs for rent supplement assistance pursuant to Section 101 of the Housing and Urban
 Development Act of 1965, Section 1701s of Title 12 of the United States Code, as amended.

(v) Programs under Sections 514, 515, 516, 533, and 538 of the Housing Act of 1949 (Public Law 81-171), as amended.

(vi) The low-income housing credit program set forth in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, this section, and Sections 12206 and 23610.5.

(vii) Programs for loans or grants administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development.

(viii) Section 202 of the Housing Act of 1959 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1701q), as amended.

(ix) Section 142(d) of the Internal Revenue Code or its predecessors.

(x) Section 147 of the Internal Revenue Code, as enacted by the Tax Reform Act of 1986 (Public Law 99-514), or as subsequently amended, including as amended by the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (Public Law 115-97) and all amendments enacted prior to the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 (Public Law 115-97).

(xi) Title I of the Housing and Community Development Act of 1974, as amended.

(xii) Title II of the Cranston-Gonzalez National Affordable Housing Act of 1990, as amended.

(xiii) Titles IV and V of the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act of 1987, as amended, including the Department of Housing and Urban Development’s Supportive Housing Program, Shelter Plus Care Program, and surplus federal property disposition program.

(xiv) The
 following assistance provided by counties and cities in exchange for restrictions on the maximum rents that may be charged for units within a multifamily rental housing development and on the maximum tenant income as a condition of eligibility for occupancy of the unit subject to the rent restriction, as reflected by a recorded agreement with a county or city:

(I) Loans or grants provided using tax increment financing pursuant to the Community Redevelopment Law (Part 1 (commencing with Section 33000) of Division 24 of the Health and Safety Code).

(II) Local housing trust funds, as referred to in Section 50843 of the Health and Safety Code.

(III) The sale or lease of public property at or below market rates.

(IV) The granting of density bonuses, or
 concessions or incentives, including fee waivers, parking variances, or amendments to general plans, zoning, or redevelopment project area plans, pursuant to Chapter 4.3 (commencing with Section 65915) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code.

(B) As used in subparagraph (A), “government assistance” shall not include the use of tenant-based housing choice vouchers under subsection (o) of Section 1437f of Title 42 of the United States Code, excluding paragraph (13) relating to project-based assistance. Restrictions shall not include any rent control or rent stabilization ordinance imposed by a county or city.

(C) If the development is subject to restrictions on rent and income levels, 50 percent of the units are also restricted to initial occupancy by lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(D) The restrictions on rent and income levels, excluding any restrictions recorded pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 65863.11 or Section 65863.13 of the Government Code or in connection with interim or acquisition financing, will terminate or the federally insured mortgage or rent subsidy contract on the property is eligible for prepayment or termination any time within five years before or after the date of application to the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(E) The entity acquiring the property enters into a regulatory agreement that requires the property to be operated in accordance with the requirements of Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code and any further requirements added by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee to implement the low-income housing tax credit established by Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. Sec.
 42), this section, and Sections 12206 and 23610.5 pursuant to Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 50199.4) of Part 1 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) The property satisfies the requirements of Section 42(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rehabilitation expenditures treated as separate new building, except that the provisions of Section 42(e)(3)(A)(ii)(I) shall not apply.

(7) On and after January 1, 2018, in the case of any qualified low-income building that is (A) farmworker housing, as defined by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and (B) is federally subsidized, the term “applicable percentage” means for each of the first three years, 20 percent of the qualified basis of the building, and for the fourth year, 15 percent of the qualified basis of the building.

(d) The term “qualified low-income housing project” as defined in Section 42(c)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to qualified low-income building, is modified by adding the following requirements:

(1) The taxpayer shall be entitled to receive a cash distribution from the operations of the project, after funding required reserves, that, at the election of the taxpayer, is equal to:

(A) An amount not to exceed 8 percent of the lesser of:

(i) The owner equity, which shall include the amount of the capital contributions actually paid to the housing sponsor and shall not include any amounts until they are paid on an investor note.

(ii) Twenty percent of the adjusted basis of the building as
 of the close of the first taxable year of the credit period.

(B) The amount of the cashflow from those units in the building that are not low-income units. For purposes of computing cashflow under this subparagraph, operating costs shall be allocated to the low-income units using the “floor space fraction,” as defined in Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit.

(C) Any amount allowed to be distributed under subparagraph (A) that is not available for distribution during the first 5 years of the compliance period may be accumulated and distributed any time during the first 15 years of the compliance period but not thereafter.

(2) The limitation on return shall apply in the aggregate to the partners if the housing sponsor is a partnership and in the aggregate to the shareholders if
 the housing sponsor is an “S” corporation.

(3) The housing sponsor shall apply any cash available for distribution in excess of the amount eligible to be distributed under paragraph (1) to reduce the rent on rent-restricted units or to increase the number of rent-restricted units subject to the tests of Section 42(g)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to in general.

(e) The provisions of Section 42(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to definition and special rules relating to credit period, shall be modified as follows:

(1) The term “credit period” as defined in Section 42(f)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to credit period defined, is modified by substituting “four taxable years” for “10 taxable years.”

(2) The special rule for
 the first taxable year of the credit period under Section 42(f)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to special rules for 1st year of credit period, shall not apply to the tax credit under this section.

(3) Section 42(f)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to determination of applicable percentage with respect to increases in qualified basis after 1st year of credit period, is modified to read:

If, as of the close of any taxable year in the compliance period, after the first year of the credit period, the qualified basis of any building exceeds the qualified basis of that building as of the close of the first year of the credit period, the housing sponsor, to the extent of its tax credit allocation, shall be eligible for a credit on the excess in an amount equal to the applicable percentage determined pursuant to subdivision (c) for the four-year period beginning with the taxable year in
 which the increase in qualified basis occurs.

(f) The provisions of Section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on aggregate credit allowable with respect to projects located in a state, shall be modified as follows:

(1) Section 42(h)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to allocated credit amount to apply to all taxable years ending during or after credit allocation year, does not apply and instead the following provisions apply:

The total amount for the four-year credit period of the housing credit dollars allocated in a calendar year to any building shall reduce the aggregate housing credit dollar amount of the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee for the calendar year in which the allocation is made.

(2) Paragraphs (3), (4), (5),
 (6)(E)(i)(II), (6)(F), (6)(G), (6)(I), (7), and (8) of Section 42(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to limitation on aggregate credit allowable with respect to projects located in a state, do not apply to this section.

(g) The aggregate housing credit dollar amount that may be allocated annually by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee pursuant to this section, Section 12206, and Section 23610.5 shall be an amount equal to the sum of all the following:

(1) (A) Seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) for the 2001 calendar year, and, for the 2002 calendar year and each calendar year thereafter, seventy million dollars ($70,000,000) increased by the percentage, if any, by which the Consumer Price Index for the preceding calendar year exceeds the Consumer Price Index for the 2001 calendar year. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “Consumer
 Price Index” means the last Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the federal Department of Labor.

(B) Five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for the 2020 calendar year, and up to five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) for the 2021 calendar year and every year thereafter. Allocations shall only be available pursuant to this subparagraph in the 2021 calendar year and thereafter if the annual Budget Act, or if any bill providing for appropriations related to the Budget Act, specifies an amount to be available for allocation in that calendar year by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee, and after the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee have adopted regulations, rules, or guidelines to align the programs of both committees with the objective of increasing production and containing costs as described in clause (iii). The California Tax Credit Allocation
 Committee shall accept applications for the 2021 calendar year not sooner than 30 days after these regulations, rules, or guidelines have been adopted. The California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall not accept applications for the 2021 calendar year for bond allocations for an eligible project under this section prior to issuing, reviewing, and publishing a new tax-exempt private activity bond demand survey. A housing sponsor receiving a nonfederally subsidized allocation under subdivision (c) shall not be eligible for receipt of the housing credit allocated from the increased amount under this subparagraph. Except as provided in clause (vi), a housing sponsor receiving a nonfederally subsidized allocation under subdivision (c) shall remain eligible for receipt of the housing credit allocated from the credit ceiling amount under subparagraph (A).

(i) Eligible projects for allocations under this subparagraph include any new building, as
 defined in Section 42(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to newly constructed buildings, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, excluding rehabilitation expenditures under Section 42(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to rehabilitation expenditures treated as separate new building, and is federally subsidized. Eligible projects for allocations under this subparagraph also include any retrofitting and repurposing of existing nonresidential structures, including, but not limited to, hotels and motels, that were converted to residential use within the previous five years from the date of the application.

(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for allocations pursuant to this subparagraph for the 2020 calendar year, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall consider projects located throughout the state and shall allocate housing credits, subject to the minimum federal requirements as set forth in
 Sections 42 and 142 of the Internal Revenue Code, the minimum requirements set forth in Sections 5033 and 5190 of the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee regulations, and the minimum set forth in Section 10326 of the Tax Credit Allocation Committee regulations, for projects that can begin construction within 180 days from award, subject to availability of funds.

(iii) (I) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, for allocations pursuant to this subparagraph for the 2021 calendar year and thereafter, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee and the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee shall develop and prescribe regulations, rules, or guidelines necessary to implement a new allocation methodology that is aimed at increasing production and containing costs, which would include a scoring system that maximizes the efficient use of public subsidy and benefit created through the private activity
 bond and low-income housing tax credit programs. The factors for determining the efficient use of public subsidy and benefit shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(ia) The number and size of units developed including local incentives provided to increase density.

(ib) The proximity to amenities, jobs, and public transportation.

(ic) The location of the development.

(id) The delivery of housing affordable to very low and extremely low income households by the development.

(II) The efficient use of public subsidy and benefit criteria specified in this clause shall take into account the total state subsidy provided and prioritize cost containment and increased unit
 production. These regulations, rules, or guidelines developed pursuant to this subparagraph shall also consider updated definitions for at-risk preservation and new construction.

(III) For bond allocations for the 2021 calendar year to projects eligible for an allocation under this subparagraph, the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee may adopt emergency regulations.

(IV) The California Tax Credit Allocation Committee shall consider amending the regulations establishing a scoring system, as required by this clause, to also grant, for farmworker housing as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, maximum points to farmworker housing projects under the housing needs category, and an initial five points in the category for site amenities beyond those required as additional thresholds.

(iv) Of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, and notwithstanding any other requirement of this section, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate up to two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) for housing financed by the California Housing Finance Agency under its Mixed-Income Program.

(v) (I) For the calendar years of 2024 to 2034, inclusive, of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, the lesser of 5 percent of that amount or twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) per calendar year shall be set aside for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code, and administered consistent with the credits available pursuant to paragraph (4).

(II) Any credits pursuant to this clause that remain unallocated following the conclusion of a
 funding round shall roll over to consecutive subsequent funding rounds in that calendar year with the exception that any credits that remain unallocated after the final funding round in that calendar year shall be added back to the aggregate amount of credits that may be allocated pursuant to this subparagraph.

(III) For the 2035 calendar year, and every year thereafter, of the amount available pursuant to this subparagraph, a portion of the amount allocated shall be set aside for projects to provide farmworker housing, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 50199.7 of the Health and Safety Code. The amount set aside shall be determined by the Legislature upon consideration of the comprehensive strategy, or most recent update thereof, provided by the Department of Housing and Community Development pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 50408.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(vi) (I) For any calendar year in which the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee has declared a competition for the award of tax-exempt bond authority for qualified residential rental projects, the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee may allocate some or all of the credits allocated under this subparagraph, except for any credits allocated for housing financed by the California Housing Finance Agency under its Mixed-Income Program, for nonfederally subsidized buildings eligible for credits under Section 42 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to low-income housing credit, and shall allocate the remainder of these credits for new buildings, as defined in Section 42(i)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to new buildings, that are federally subsidized and that can begin construction within a reasonable time, as determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(II) For any
 calendar year in which the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee has not declared a competition for the award of tax-exempt bond authority for qualified residential rental projects, projects receiving an award of credits pursuant to this subparagraph shall begin construction within a reasonable time, as determined by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.
